Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1837.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4307. Child torture.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person intentionally, knowingly or recklessly tortures a child who is within the custody or physical control of the person.(b) Grading.--(1) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree if the victim does not suffer bodily injury.(2) An offense under this section is a felony of the first degree if the victim suffers bodily injury.(c) Counseling.--A court shall consider ordering a person convicted of an offense under this section to undergo 123456789101112131415161718 counseling.(d) Personal injury crime.--An offense under this section shall constitute a personal injury crime under the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Emotional distress." As defined in section 2709.1(f) (relating to stalking)."Period of time." More than a single 48-hour period."Person." An individual, including a parent or guardian of a child."Sexual abuse or exploitation." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(a) (relating to definitions)."Torture." A course of conduct against a child that includes at least one of the following acts or substantially similar acts:(1) Breaking, severing or severely impairing a limb of the child.(2) Inflicting severe and prolonged pain from striking, burning or cutting the child.(3) Causing or allowing a grossly unreasonable period of time where the child is deprived of food or water.(4) Knowingly restraining the child so as to interfere substantially with the child's liberty in a grossly unreasonable manner that serves no legitimate parental purpose.(5) Forcing the child to remain in an area that is not 20250HB1837PN2273 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suitable for habitation, including an area where urine or feces is actively present.(6) Subjecting the child to extreme temperatures without adequate clothing.(7) Forcing excessive and unnecessary time periods of exercise or other physical acts as a form of punishment against the child.(8) Engaging in the sexual abuse or exploitation of the child or allowing or participating in the sexual abuse or exploitation of the child by another person.(9) Repeatedly intimidating or humiliating the child for the purpose of causing significant emotional distress.(10) Terrorizing or threatening death or harm to the child, a loved one of the child or a pet or loved object of the child for the purpose of causing significant emotional distress.(11) Restricting basic and necessary bodily functions needed for the personal hygiene of the child.(12) Engaging in conduct that places the child at risk of serious bodily injury.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1837PN2273 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021